Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 4
WORK-STUDY PROGRAM

Editor's note:

This part 4 is similar to part 2 of article 1 of this title as it existed prior to 1979.

23-3.3-401. Work-study program established - requirements.

The commission shall use a portion of any moneys remaining after meeting the requirements of parts 2 and 3 of this article to provide a work-study program of employment of qualifying students in good standing with the institution in which they are enrolled in positions that are directly under the control of the institution in which the student is enrolled or in positions with nonprofit organizations, governmental agencies, or for-profit organizations with which the institution may execute student employment contracts.

Any in-state student who is enrolled or accepted for enrollment at an institution as an undergraduate may qualify for participation in the work-study program established pursuant to this section.

Funds appropriated to the commission may also be used by the commission in conjunction with and to supplement funds for current job opportunities or to supplement or match funds made available through any other public or private program for financial assistance. A sum not to exceed thirty percent of the funds allocated by the commission for the work-study program may be used to provide funding on a basis other than financial need. A sum of not less than seventy percent of such money shall be used for students demonstrating financial need.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 829, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 83:

(2) amended, p. 791, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 11, § 1, effective March 6.